Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB615.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 117.087 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The challenge of a mail-in absentee ballot shall be in writing and in the hands of the
county clerk before 8 a.m. on the day preceding any primary, regular election, or
special election day.
(2) The county board of elections may appoint a central ballot counting board of not
less than three (3) members, who shall be qualified voters and no more than two-
thirds (2/3) of whom shall be members of the same political party, to process,
review, and count the ballots at the direction of the county board of elections.
(3) (a) Beginning at 8 a.m. on any primary, regular election, or special election day,
the county board of elections or central ballot counting board shall meet at the
county clerk's office or other place designated by the county board of
elections to process and review the mail-in absentee ballots returned.
Candidates or their representatives shall be permitted to be present. The
county board of elections or central ballot counting board may meet up to
fourteen (14) days prior to the day of a primary or election to review and
process the mail-in absentee ballots cast in the county. The county board of
elections or central ballot counting board shall meet as often as necessary
during these fourteen (14) days to process and review returned mail-in
absentee ballots, including expediting any signature cures.
(b) The county board of elections or counting board chair or the chair's designee
shall provide each board member with a list of all voters who have returned a
mail-in absentee ballot by mail. If a list of all voters who have returned a
mail-in absentee ballot by mail is not provided to the board, the name of each
voter who cast an absentee ballot by mail shall be read aloud. The county
board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
observe the processing and review of the ballots to determine their acceptance
or rejection.
(c) Acceptance or rejection of the mail-in absentee ballots shall be determined as
follows:
1. The county board of elections or the central ballot counting board shall
open the boxes containing absentee ballots returned by mail, hand
delivered, or deposited in a drop-box or receptacle, and remove the
envelopes one (1) at a time. All mail-in absentee ballots returned shall
have their barcode or unique label scanned to note official receipt;
2. As each envelope is removed, it shall be examined to ascertain whether
the outer envelope and the detachable flap are in proper order and have
been signed by the voter, except if:
a. The detachable flap and outer envelope for the voter have been
signed by a person having power of attorney for the voter, and that
person has completed the voter assistance form required by KRS
117.255; or
b. The voter has signed the detachable flap and outer envelope with
the use of a mark instead of the voter's signature, the county board
of elections or the central ballot counting board shall verify that
the mark was made in the presence of two (2) witnesses;
3. Ballots with unsigned detachable flaps or outer envelopes shall be
rejected automatically;
4. Ballots that have not been sent by the county clerk to a qualified voter,
but are received by the county board of elections or the central ballot
counting board shall be rejected automatically;
5. The members of the county board of elections, or the members of the
central ballot counting board, shall compare the signatures on the outer
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
envelope and the detachable flap with the signature of the voter that
appears on the voter's signature of record, which record shall include the
signature on the voter's identity document as defined in KRS 186.010,
the voter's mail-in absentee ballot application, or the voter's registration
card. If a signature match cannot be made, the county board of elections,
central ballot counting board, or the county clerk shall make a
reasonable effort to contact the voter and provide notice to the voter
with a timeframe and manner in which the voter may cure his or her
signature relative to the mail-in absentee ballot signature. All signature
cures shall be completed before the closing of the polls on the day of a
primary or an election;
6. If the outer envelope and the detachable flap are found to be in order,
the members of the county board of elections or the members of the
central ballot counting board shall verify the voter's name from the list
of persons who were sent mail-in absentee ballots, but if a list has not
been provided to the board, the name of the voter shall be read aloud;
7. If the vote of the voter is not rejected on a challenge as provided in
subparagraph 8. of this paragraph or as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the members of the county board of elections or the
members of the central ballot counting board shall remove the
detachable flap and place the secrecy envelope unopened in a ballot box
which has been provided for the purpose;
8. When the name of a voter who cast a mail-in absentee ballot is
processed and reviewed by the members of the county board of elections
or the members of the central ballot counting board, the vote of the voter
may be challenged by any board member or by the written challenge
provided in subsection (1) of this section and the challenge may be
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
determined and the vote accepted or rejected by the board as if the voter
was present and voting in person; but if the outer envelope and the
detachable flap are regular, and each substantially comply with the
provisions of this chapter, they shall be considered as showing that the
voter is prima facie entitled to vote. If the vote of a voter is rejected
pursuant to the challenge, the secrecy envelope shall not be opened, but
returned to the outer envelope upon which the chair or member shall
write on the envelope the word "rejected";
9. If irregularities are discovered in the review and processing of the mail-
in absentee ballot, the county board of elections or the central ballot
counting board shall immediately report to the county attorney or the
Office of the Attorney General; and
10. The ballot box into which all accepted mail-in absentee ballots are
placed shall be locked with at least two (2) locks and the keys to the box
shall be retained by at least two (2) members of the county board of
elections who are not of the same political affiliation or two (2)
members of the central ballot counting board, who are not of the same
political affiliation. The box shall remain locked until the ballots are
counted.
(d) The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A establishing the form of the notice
required under this subsection for the curing of signatures.
(4) (a) Beginning at 8 a.m. local time on any primary, regular election, or special
election day, the county board of elections or a central ballot counting board
shall meet in the county clerk's office or other place designated by the county
board of elections to:
1. Review and process any mail-in absentee ballots returned using the
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
procedures in subsection (3) of this section; and
2. Count, or the county board of elections may oversee the count by the
central ballot counting board, the accepted mail-in absentee ballots and
total and record the in-person absentee votes cast.
(b) During the review, processing, and counting of the absentee ballots and votes,
candidates or their representatives shall be permitted to be present, and the
county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to
observe.
(5) After the challenges have been made and all the blank secrecy envelopes have been
placed in a ballot box, the box shall be thoroughly shaken or shuffled to redistribute
the absentee ballots in the box to ensure secrecy of the vote. The board shall open
the ballot box, remove the absentee ballots from the secrecy envelopes, and count
the ballots.
(6) The board shall unlock and break the tamper-resistant seal to any voting equipment
used to cast in-person absentee ballots, as provided for in KRS 117.076, and a total
of all in-person absentee ballots shall be made and recorded on the form provided
by the State Board of Elections.
(7) No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of the absentee ballot
results or any partial results as provided in this section to any person except those
persons, election officials, or entities authorized by law to receive it, until 7 p.m.[6
p.m.] prevailing time on the day of a primary or an election.
Section 2. KRS 118.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The polls shall be opened on the day of a primary, special election, or regular
election at 6 a.m., prevailing time, and shall remain open until each voter who is
waiting in line at the polls at 7 p.m.[6 p.m.], prevailing time, has voted. At 7 p.m.[6
p.m.], prevailing time, if voters are waiting at the polls to vote, the precinct election
sheriff shall announce that a voter wishing to vote must immediately get in line.
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
When all voters waiting at the polls at that time are in line, the precinct election
sheriff shall then determine which voter is the last in line, and that voter shall be the
last voter permitted to vote. The precinct election sheriff shall wait in line with the
last voter who shall be permitted to vote until that voter has voted and shall inform
a voter who subsequently arrives at the polls that no one shall be permitted to vote
after the last voter in line at 7 p.m.[6 p.m.], prevailing time. After the last voter
waiting in line at 7 p.m.[6 p.m.], prevailing time, has voted, the polls shall then be
closed.
(2) As provided in Section 148 of the Constitution of Kentucky, any person entitled to
a vote at any election in this state shall, if he or she has made application for leave
prior to the day he or she appears before the county clerk to request an application
for or to execute an absentee ballot, be entitled to absent himself or herself from
any services or employment in which he or she is then engaged or employed for a
reasonable time, but not less than four (4) hours on the day he or she appears before
the clerk to request an application for or to execute an absentee ballot, during
normal business hours of the office of the clerk or to cast his or her ballot on the
day of the election between the time of opening and closing the polls. The employer
may specify the hours during which an employee may absent himself or herself.
(3) No person shall be penalized for taking a reasonable time off to vote, unless, under
circumstances which did not prohibit him or her from voting, he or she fails to
vote. Any qualified voter who exercises his or her right to voting leave under this
section but fails to cast his or her vote, under circumstances which did not prohibit
him or her from voting, may be subject to disciplinary action.
(4) Any person selected to serve as an election officer shall be entitled to absent
himself or herself from any services or employment in which he or she is then
engaged or employed for a period of an entire day to attend training or to serve as
an election officer. The person shall not, because of so absenting himself or herself,
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
be liable to any penalty. The employer may specify the hours during which the
employee may absent himself or herself. No person shall refuse an employee the
privilege hereby conferred, or discharge or threaten to discharge an employee or
subject an employee to a penalty, because of the exercise of the privilege.
Section 3. KRS 117.076 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any voter who is qualified to vote on election day in the county of his or her
residence may choose to cast a no-excuse in-person absentee ballot on the
Thursday, Friday, or Saturday immediately preceding the day of an election. The
available hours from which a voter may cast his or her vote during these three (3)
days shall be no less than eight (8) hours between 6 a.m. and 8 p.m. prevailing time,
as determined by the county board of elections of each county.
(2) Any voter who is qualified to vote on election day in the county of his or her
residence may make application to cast an excused in-person absentee ballot during
normal business hours during the six (6) business days immediately preceding the
Thursday of no-excuse in-person absentee voting under subsection (1) of this
section. The voter who makes application under this subsection shall meet one (1)
of the following requirements in order to cast his or her excused in-person absentee
ballot:
(a) Is a resident of Kentucky who is a covered voter as defined in KRS 117A.010,
who will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an
election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
(b) Has surgery, or whose spouse has surgery, scheduled that will require
hospitalization on the day of an election and during the days of no-excuse in-
person absentee voting;
(c) Temporarily resides outside the state, but is still eligible to vote in this state
and will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an
election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
(d) Is a resident of Kentucky who is a uniformed-service voter as defined in KRS
117A.010 confined to a military base on election day and during the days of
no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
(e) Is in her last trimester of pregnancy;
(f) Has not been declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction
and, due to age, disability, or illness, is not able to appear at the polls on
election day and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
(g) Is a caregiver who is providing medical or healthcare assistance to a voter
who is qualified to cast a ballot under paragraph (f) of this subsection;
(h) Is a student who temporarily resides outside the county of his or her residence
and will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an
election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
(i) Any person employed in an occupation that is scheduled to work during all
days and all hours, which shall include commute time, the polls are open on
election day and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;
(j) Any election officer tasked with election administration for the current
election cycle; or
(k) Any person prevented from voting in person at the polls on election day and
from casting a no-excuse in-person absentee ballot on all days no-excuse in-
person absentee voting is conducted because he or she will be absent from the
county of his or her residence during all days and all hours no-excuse in-
person absentee voting is conducted.
(3) Any voter who votes an in-person absentee or federal provisional in-person
absentee ballot shall provide proof of identification as defined in KRS 117.001 or
meet the requirements of KRS 117.228 or 117.229.
(4) In-person absentee voting shall be conducted in a location within the county clerk's
office where ballots shall be cast secretly. In-person absentee voting may occur in
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
another location within the county if the location is designated by the county board
of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections. The county clerk may
provide for voting by the voting equipment in general use in the county or any other
voting equipment approved by the State Board of Elections for use in Kentucky.
Public notice of the locations shall be given pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and
similar notice by mail shall be given to the county chairs of the two (2) political
parties whose candidates polled the largest number of votes in the county at the last
regular election.
(5) Any voter qualifying to vote who receives assistance to vote in-person absentee
shall complete the voter assistance form required by KRS 117.255.
(6) Any voter qualifying to vote whose qualifications are challenged on grounds other
than inability to provide proof of identification by any clerk or deputy shall
complete an oath of voter affidavit.
(7) Each voter casting his or her vote in-person absentee shall sign an in-person
absentee ballot signature roster.
(8) The members of the county board of elections, or their designees who provide equal
representation of both political parties, may serve as precinct election officers,
without compensation, for all in-person absentee voting conducted. If the members
of the county board of elections or their designees serve as precinct election officers
for in-person absentee voting, they shall perform the same duties and exercise the
same authority as precinct election officers who serve on the day of an election. If
the members of the county board of elections or their designees do not serve as
precinct election officers for in-person absentee voting, the county clerk or deputy
county clerks shall supervise the in-person absentee voting.
(9) Any individual qualified to appoint challengers for the day of an election may also
appoint challengers to observe all in-person absentee voting, and those challengers
may exercise the same privileges as challengers appointed for observing voting on
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
the day of an election at a regular polling place.
(10) During the days of in-person absentee voting, all voting equipment on which in-
person absentee ballots are cast shall remain locked and the keys shall be retained
by at least two (2) members of the central ballot counting board who are not of the
same political affiliation or by two (2) members of the county board of elections
who are not of the same political affiliation, and the voting equipment shall remain
locked with a tamper-resistant seal until the ballots are counted.
(11) No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of in-person absentee
ballots, or any partial results, to any person except when provided to the county
board of elections under KRS 117.087, until 7 p.m.[6 p.m.] prevailing time on the
day of a primary or an election.
(12) (a) Before and after each day of in-person absentee voting, on all voting
equipment to be used, the tamper-resistant seal shall be checked to ensure it is
unaltered and the number on the public counter shall be read and recorded.
The status of the tamper-resistant seal shall be indicated and the number on
the public counter of each voting equipment shall be recorded by the county
clerk or his or her designated election official, member of the county board of
elections, or member of the central ballot counting board. The status of the
tamper-resistant seal and the number recorded from the public counter shall
be witnessed by an election official who is of a different political affiliation
than the person recording.
(b) The status of the tamper-resistant seal and the number on the public counter
shall be recorded on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of
Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS
Chapter 13A.
(c) The witness who is present shall verify, through validity of his or her
signature on the form provided, the accuracy of the number recorded from the
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
public counter, the number recorded on the prescribed form, and the status of
the tamper-resistant seal.
(d) Any irregularities observed by the election official who is recording and the
election official who is a witness shall be immediately reported to the county
attorney or the Office of Attorney General.
(13) The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A to provide for the casting of ballots in
accordance with this section.
Section 4. KRS 117.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At the count of the votes in any precinct, any candidate or slate of candidates and
any representatives to witness and check the count of the votes therein, who are
authorized to be appointed as is provided in subsection (8) of this section, shall be
admitted and permitted to be present and witness the count.
(2) As soon as the polls are closed, and the last voter has voted, the judges at that time
shall immediately lock and seal the voting equipment so that the voting and
counting mechanisms will be prevented from operating, and they shall sign a
certificate stating:
(a) That the voting equipment has been locked against voting and sealed;
(b) The number of voters, as shown on the public counters;
(c) The number registered on the protective or cumulative counter or device; and
(d) The number or other designation of the voting equipment.
The certificate, with any additional certificate previously prepared under KRS
117.035, shall be returned by the judges of election to the officials authorized by
law to receive it. The judges shall compare the number of voters, as shown by the
counter of the voting equipment, with the number of those who have voted as
shown by the protective or cumulative counter or device.
(3) Where voting equipment is used that prints the candidates' names along with the
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
total votes received on a return sheet or record for that equipment, the precinct
election officers shall sign the return sheets or record for the voting equipment,
which shall be posted on the door of the precinct.
(4) If any officer shall decline to sign the return sheets, he or she shall state the reason
in writing, and a copy thereof, signed by the officer, shall be enclosed with the
return sheets.
(5) Each of the return sheets, if applicable, and the record of the voting equipment shall
be enclosed in an envelope. One (1) copy of the return sheets, if applicable, one (1)
copy of the record of the voting equipment, and the write-in roll, if any write-in
votes were cast in the precinct, shall be directed to the county board of elections of
the county in which the election is being held. One (1) copy of the return sheets or
record of the voting equipment shall be given to the county clerk of the county in
which the election is being held and to each of the local governing bodies of the two
(2) dominant political parties, but a local governing body of a dominant political
party may decline a copy of the precinct election return by filing a written
declination with the county board of elections prior to the election, and upon this
declination, a printed copy shall not be issued to the political party so declining.
The declination on file shall be effective for that election and any subsequent
elections until revoked by the local governing body of a dominant political party by
filing a written revocation with the county board of elections. The envelope shall
have endorsed thereon a certificate of the election officers, stating the number or
unique designation of the voting equipment, the precinct where it has been used, the
number on the seal, and the number on the protective or cumulative counter or
device at the close of the polls.
(6) During the period established by KRS 117.355(3), and following the tabulation of
all votes cast in the election, including absentee votes and write-in votes:
(a) The county board of elections shall mail, transmit via facsimile machine,
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
hand-deliver, or submit by electronic means a copy of the precinct-by-precinct
summary of the tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct to the
State Board of Elections. The copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the
tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct shall include the
votes cast on the day of an election and during absentee voting; and
(b) The county clerk shall mail or deliver the precinct signature rosters from each
precinct and the in-person absentee ballot signature roster to the State Board
of Elections.
(7) For each voting location, as soon as possible after the completion of the count, the
two (2) election officers who are not of the same political affiliation shall return to
the county board of elections the keys to the voting equipment received and
receipted for by them, and the county clerk, in each voting location, shall have the
voting equipment properly boxed or securely covered and removed to a proper and
secure place of storage.
(8) In primaries, each candidate or group of candidates may designate to the county
board of elections a representative to witness and check the vote count. In regular
elections, the governing authority of each political party, each candidate for
member of board of education, nonpartisan candidate, political group candidate,
political organization candidate, independent candidate, or independent ticket may
designate a representative to the county board of elections to witness and check the
vote count. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the
news media to witness the vote count.
(9) For all federal provisional ballots, if applicable, and supplemental paper ballots if
approved as provided in KRS 118.215, after the polls are closed, the two (2) judges
shall return to the county clerk's office the locked federal provisional ballot
receptacle and the supplemental paper ballot box, all ballot stubs, spoiled ballots,
and unvoted ballots at the same time as the tabulation of votes from the voting
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
equipment is delivered. The county clerk shall issue a receipt for the number of
ballot stubs, unvoted ballots, spoiled ballots, and the ballot boxes or ballot
receptacle.
(10) The county board of elections, or its designee, shall count and tally the
supplemental paper ballots that have not been tabulated by automatic tabulating
equipment at the precinct, either manually or with the use of tabulating equipment
that has been certified by the State Board of Elections for use for that purpose in the
county clerk's office. The results of the vote tally shall be certified by the county
board of elections to the county clerk and to the Secretary of State.
(11) The county board of elections shall tabulate the valid federal provisional ballots.
The results of the vote tally shall be certified by the county board of elections to the
county clerk and to the Secretary of State. The county board of elections shall mail
a copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the valid federal provisional ballot
tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct to the State Board of
Elections.
(12) The county board of elections shall authorize the candidates, slates of candidates, or
their representatives, and representatives of the news media to be present during the
counting of the supplemental and federal provisional paper ballots.
(13) No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of ballots, or any partial
results, to any person except those persons, election officials, or entities authorized
by law to receive it, until 7 p.m.[6 p.m.] prevailing time on the day of a primary or
an election.
(14) (a) Unofficial election results transmitted online to the county board of elections
or the State Board of Elections shall occur by means of a secure online
connection after results are tallied on the tally computer that has been certified
in accordance with KRS 117.379 as part of a voting system as defined in KRS
117.001.
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1004
(b) If an external device is used to upload election results for the subsequent
transmission, the device shall be used for that primary or election only and be
of a type approved by the State Board of Elections as part of a voting system
under KRS 117.379. The upload of the election results shall occur in the
presence of two (2) members of the county board of elections who are of a
different political affiliation.
(15) Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to
specified elections shall be retained for twenty-two (22) months, and the county
clerk shall retain the voted federal provisional ballots, voter affirmations, election
official affirmations, and the supplemental paper ballots for twenty-two (22)
months and the unvoted federal provisional ballots, the voter affirmations, election
official affirmations, and the supplemental paper ballots for sixty (60) days after
each election day, after which time they shall be destroyed in a manner to render
them unreadable by the county board of elections if no contest or recount action has
been filed.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 11/25/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed